Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
342I

SPECIAL
WASTES RECYCLING

Part I. Lead Acid Batteries

Section

342I-1 Lead acid batteries; disposal prohibited

342I-1.5 Disposal of electrolyte; prohibited

342I-2 Lead acid batteries; collection for
recycling

342I-2.5 Recycling

342I-3 Inspection of lead acid battery facilities

342I-4 Lead acid battery wholesalers

342I-5 Enforcement

342I-6 Recordkeeping

342I-7 Entry and inspection of records

342I-8 Penalties

342I-9 Disposition of collected fines and
penalties

Part II. Used Motor Vehicle Tire Recovery

342I-21 Definitions

342I-22 Motor vehicle tires; disposal in landfill
or

municipal solid waste incinerator
prohibited

342I-23 Motor vehicle tires; collection for
recycling

342I-24 Inspection of motor vehicle tire retailers

342I-25 Motor vehicle tire wholesalers

342I-26 Registration and recordkeeping
requirements

342I-27 Repealed

342I-28 Tire inventory records and payment

342I-29 Deposit into environmental management
special fund

342I-30 Recovery of costs

342I-31 Contract for administrative services

342I-32 Entry and inspection of facilities

342I-33 Enforcement

342I-34 Penalties

342I-35 Disposition of collected fines and
penalties

Note

Chapter title amended by L 1993, c 209, §1.

Cross References

Litter control, see chapter 339.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Plastic container coding, see §§342H-41, 42.

Recycling market development, see §342G-48.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next